Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Chapter 21. Lower Mississippi River Basin Development District
[Repealed]

§§ 51-21-1 through 51-21-14.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 403, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§51-21-1 through §51-21-11. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5956-321 to 5956-326; Laws, 1966, ch. 259, §§ 1-6]

§51-21-13. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-327; Laws, 1966, ch. 259, § 7; Laws, 1974, ch. 518 § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 615, § 11]

§51-21-14. [Laws, 1974, ch. 518 § 2]

§§ 51-21-15 through 51-21-31.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 403, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§51-21-15. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-328; Laws, 1966, ch. 259, § 8.]

§51-21-17. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-329; Laws, 1966, ch. 259, § 9.]

§51-21-19. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-330; Laws, 1966, ch. 259, § 10.]

§51-21-21. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-331; Laws, 1966, ch. 259, § 11.]

§51-21-23. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-332; Laws, 1966, ch. 259, § 12.]

§51-21-25. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-333; Laws, 1966, ch. 259, § 13.]

§51-21-27. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-334; Laws, 1966, ch. 259, § 14.]

§51-21-29. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-335; Laws, 1966, ch. 259, § 15.]

§51-21-31. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-336; Laws, 1966, ch. 259, § 16.]